Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.100

Bonds of commissioners and employees.

Every member of the city commission, before qualifying, shall give a good and sufficient bond to the city in a sum equivalent to five times the amount of his or her annual salary, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office. The bonds must be approved by a judge of the superior court for the county in which the city is located and filed with the clerk thereof. The commission, by resolution, may require any of its appointees to give bond to be fixed and approved by the commission and filed with the mayor.

[ 2007 c 218 s 65; 1965 c 7 s 35.17.100. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 6; RRS s 9095.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.